Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 37

Biobased Products Act of 2005

25-37-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Biobased product” means a product determined by the United States Secretary of Agriculture to be a commercial or industrial product, other than food or feed, that is composed, in whole or in significant part, of biological products or renewable domestic agricultural materials, including plant, animal, and marine materials or forestry materials;

“Biomass” means any organic material that is available on a renewable or recurring basis.

“Biomass” includes:

Agricultural crops;

Trees grown for energy production;

Wood waste and wood residues;

Plants, including aquatic plants and grasses;

Residues;

Fibers;

Animal wastes and other waste materials; and

Fats, oils, and greases, including recycled fats, oils, and greases.

“Biomass” does not include:

Paper that is commonly recycled; or

Unsegregated solid waste; and

“State agency” means any agency, institution, authority, department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other agency of the state supported by appropriation of state or federal funds, including, but not limited to:

The constitutional departments of the state;

The elected constitutional offices of the state;

The General Assembly, including, but not limited to:

The Legislative Council;

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and

Any supporting agencies and bureaus of the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee;

The Supreme Court;

The Court of Appeals;

The circuit courts;

The prosecuting attorneys; and

The Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 542, § 1.

25-37-102. Procurement of biobased products.

After the date specified in the guidelines prepared under subsection (b) of this section, each state agency that procures any items designated in the guidelines shall give preference in making procurement decisions to the items composed of the highest percentage of biobased products that are:

Practicable; and

Consistent with maintaining a satisfactory level of competition.

The Office of State Procurement of the Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare and, from time to time, revise guidelines for the use of procuring agencies in complying with the requirements of this section.

The guidelines shall:

Be developed using federal guidelines that designate biobased products that qualify for preferred procurement as authorized by section 9002 of the Farm Security and Rural Investment Act of 2002, 7 U.S.C. § 8102, as those federal guidelines and that federal law existed on January 1, 2005;

Provide direct or indirect access to information regarding items identified or certified by federal rules, as they existed on January 1, 2005, that are or can be produced with biobased products and whose procurement by procuring agencies will carry out the objectives of this section;

Set forth recommended practices with respect to the procurement of biobased products and items containing biobased materials; and

Provide direct or indirect access to information on availability, relative price, performance, and environmental and public health benefits of biobased materials and items.

The office shall prepare final procurement guidelines under this section within one hundred eighty (180) days based on the federal regulations pursuant to 7 U.S.C. § 8102 as they existed on January 1, 2005.

The office shall implement the requirements of this section.

Every two (2) years beginning on or before June 30, 2006, the office shall report to the Joint Budget Committee during each regular session of the General Assembly on:

Actions taken by state agencies with regard to purchases of biobased products; and

Progress made in the implementation of this section, including agency compliance with subsection (b) of this section.

Every two (2) years, on or before March 31, each state agency shall report to the office on the effectiveness of the agency's procurement program.

The office shall prepare and make available to each state agency a procedure for presenting the report required under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section.

[Reserved]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 59, § 47, provided:

“ALLOCATION RESTRICTIONS. The Secretary of the Arkansas Department of Agriculture shall at no time designate general revenue allocations to the State Plant Board, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and the Arkansas Forestry Commission at a level less than the revenue distribution provided in the Official Forecast of state general revenue in effect for each of those agencies.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 890, § 46, provided:

“ALLOCATION RESTRICTIONS. The Secretary of the Arkansas Department of Agriculture shall at no time designate general revenue allocations to the State Plant Board, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission and the Arkansas Forestry Commission at a level less than the revenue distribution provided in the Official Forecast of state general revenue in effect for each of those agencies.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, No. 533, § 2: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2007, is essential to the operations of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and the Arkansas Agriculture Department both of whose fiscal years begin on July 1, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 2007, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 752, § 6: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act transfers the Division of Land Surveys in the Office of Commissioner of State Lands to the Arkansas Agriculture Department; that to effectively administer this act the transition should occur at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2007, is essential to the operation of the agencies. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2015, No. 1060, § 20: Apr. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the efficient administration of the programs and functions conducted by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority is critical to the economic well-being of the state; that it is vital that business and citizens are immediately encouraged to the full extent possible to use the authority's programs and thereby help the economic development of state resources; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the authority's programs are operated efficiently and in a manner that does not hinder participation or negatively impact program applicants. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 542, § 1.